apertium-kas.kas.dix
    <!-- gupun -->
    <pardef n="gup/un__n">
        <e><p><l>un</l> <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>an</l> <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nan</l> <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nav</l> <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nas</l> <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nan</l> <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nú</l> <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nav</l> <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- kitaab -->
    <pardef n="kitaab__n">
        <e><p><l></l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e><!-- ú ??? -->
        <e><p><l>i</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>av</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>i</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>an</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>i</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>av</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- beni -->
    <pardef n="ben/i__n">
        <e><p><l>i</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>i</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>i</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yav</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>i</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yan</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>i</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yav</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Copula -->
    <pardef n="/âsun__vbcop">
        <e><p><l>âsun</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>âsúnь</l> <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <!-- Present Tense -->
        <e><p><l>chus</l>   <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>chas</l>   <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>chukh</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>chakh</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>chu</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cha</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>chi</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cha</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>chivú</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e><!---->
        <e><p><l>chavú</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e><!---->
        <e><p><l>chi</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cha</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <!-- Past Tense -->
        <e><p><l>ôsus</l>   <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aesús</l>   <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>úosukh</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aesúkh</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ôs</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aes</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aesь</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>âsú</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aesivú</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e><!---->
        <e><p><l>âsúvú</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e><!---->
        <e><p><l>aesь</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>âsú</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <!-- Future Tense -->
        <e><p><l>âsú</l>   <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="un"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>âsakh</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="un"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>âsi</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="un"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>âsav</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="un"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aesiv</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e><!---->
        <e><p><l>aesivú</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e><!---->
        <e><p><l>âsan</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="un"/></r></p></e>
        <!-- Participles -->
        <e><p><l>ôsmut</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/>                  </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aesmútь</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/>                  </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aesmúts</l> <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/>                 </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>âsmatsú</l> <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/>                 </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>âsân</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/>                          </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aesith</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="conj"/>                          </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>âsnai</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="conj"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
        <!-- Conditional -->
        <!-- Correct final vowels? -->
        <e><p><l>âsúhâ</l>   <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="con"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="un"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>âsúhakh</l>  <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="con"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="un"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>âsiha</l>    <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="con"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="un"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>âsúháv</l>   <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="con"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="un"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aesihiv</l>   <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="con"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="un"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>âsúhán</l>   <r>âsun<s n="vbser"/><s n="con"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="un"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="gup"><i>gup</i><par n="gup/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dram"><i>dram</i><par n="gup/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kitaab"><i>kitaab</i><par n="kitaab__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gaav"><i>gaav</i><par n="kitaab__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ben"><i>ben</i><par n="ben/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="âsun"><i></i><par n="/âsun__vbcop"/></e>
